Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202284-1309.02
Cash balance benefit; election; effect; administrative services agreements; authorized.

(1) It is the intent of the Legislature that, in order to improve the competitiveness of the retirement plan for state employees, a cash balance benefit shall be added to the State Employees Retirement Act on and after January 1, 2003. Each member who is employed and participating in the retirement system prior to January 1, 2003, may either elect to continue participation in the defined contribution benefit as provided in the act prior to January 1, 2003, or elect to participate in the cash balance benefit as set forth in this section. An active member shall make a one-time election beginning September 1, 2012, through October 31, 2012, in order to participate in the cash balance benefit. If no such election is made, the member shall be treated as though he or she elected to continue participating in the defined contribution benefit as provided in the act prior to January 1, 2003. Members who elect to participate in the cash balance benefit beginning September 1, 2012, through October 31, 2012, shall commence participation in the cash balance benefit on January 2, 2013. Any member who made the election prior to April 7, 2012, does not have to make another election of the cash balance benefit beginning September 1, 2012, through October 31, 2012.

(2) For a member employed and participating in the retirement system beginning on and after January 1, 2003, or a member employed and participating in the retirement system on January 1, 2003, who, prior to April 7, 2012, or beginning September 1, 2012, through October 31, 2012, elects to convert his or her employee and employer accounts to the cash balance benefit:

(a) The employee cash balance account within the State Employees Retirement Fund shall, at any time, be equal to the following:

(i) The initial employee account balance, if any, transferred from the defined contribution plan account described in section 84-1310; plus

(ii) Employee contribution credits deposited in accordance with section 84-1308; plus

(iii) Interest credits credited in accordance with subdivision (19) of section 84-1301; plus

(iv) Dividend amounts credited in accordance with subdivision (4)(c) of section 84-1319; and

(b) The employer cash balance account shall, at any time, be equal to the following:

(i) The initial employer account balance, if any, transferred from the defined contribution plan account described in section 84-1311; plus

(ii) Employer contribution credits deposited in accordance with section 84-1309; plus

(iii) Interest credits credited in accordance with subdivision (19) of section 84-1301; plus

(iv) Dividend amounts credited in accordance with subdivision (4)(c) of section 84-1319.

(3) In order to carry out the provisions of this section, the board may enter into administrative services agreements for accounting or record-keeping services. No agreement shall be entered into unless the board determines that it will result in administrative economy and will be in the best interests of the state and its participating employees. The board may develop a schedule for the allocation of the administrative services agreements costs for accounting or record-keeping services and may assess the costs so that each member pays a reasonable fee as determined by the board.

Laws 2002, LB 687, § 21;

Laws 2003, LB 451, § 25;

Laws 2005, LB 364, § 17;

Laws 2006, LB 366, § 10;

Laws 2006, LB 1019, § 16;

Laws 2007, LB328, § 7;

Laws 2009, LB188, § 11;

Laws 2010, LB950, § 22;

Laws 2011, LB509, § 46;

Laws 2012, LB916, § 35;

Laws 2017, LB415, § 48;

Laws 2019, LB34, § 22.